Utah statutes.
19-1-507.   Civil action.

(1)  The attorney general or a person may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek:

(a)  an injunction to enforce the part; and

(b)  if the action is brought by the attorney general, a civil penalty not to exceed $500 for each day the part is violated.

(2)  In an action brought under this section, a court may:

(a)  order injunctive relief;

(b)  impose a civil penalty to the extent provided in Subsection (1);

(c)  award attorney fees and costs to the attorney general or person who brings the civil action, if the attorney general or person prevails; or

(d)  take a combination of actions under this Subsection (2).

(3)  A civil penalty imposed under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

